Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.340

Construction, reconstruction, equipping, and demolition of community and technical college facilities and acquisition of property—Financing by bonds secured by pledge of building fees, grants.

In addition to the powers conferred under RCW 28B.50.090, the college board is authorized and shall have the power:

(1) To permit the district boards of trustees to contract for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alterations of buildings and other capital assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances of the college as approved by the state board.

(2) To finance the same by the issuance of bonds secured by the pledge of up to one hundred percent of the building fees.

(3) Without limitation of the foregoing, to accept grants from the United States government, or any federal or state agency or instrumentality, or private corporation, association, or person to aid in defraying the costs of any such projects.

(4) To retain bond counsel and professional bond consultants to aid it in issuing bonds pursuant to RCW 28B.50.340 through 28B.50.400.

[ 1991 c 238 s 49; 1985 c 390 s 54; 1971 ex.s. c 279 s 18; 1970 ex.s. c 15 s 18. Prior: 1969 ex.s. c 261 s 26; 1969 ex.s. c 238 s 6; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.340; prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 34.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 279: See note following RCW 28B.15.005.

Severability—1970 ex.s. c 15: See note following RCW 28A.230.160.